Louisiana, session 2026, HB1143.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1270.1(A), (B)(2), (3)(introductory paragraph), (b), and (d), and
(C), 1360.21, 1360.22(1) and (5) through (9), 1360.23(A), (B), (D), (G), and (I),
1360.24(A)(introductory paragraph), (3) through (5), (B), and (C), 1360.26,
1360.27(A)(introductory paragraph) and (B), 1360.28 through 1360.30, 1360.31(A), (B),
(C)(1),(2)(a)(i) and (b), (3), and (4), 1360.32, 1360.33(introductory paragraph), (5), and (6),
Page 1 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
1360.34(introductory paragraph), (4), and (5), 1360.35, 1360.36, and
1360.38(A)(introductory paragraph), (2), (3), and (4) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§1270.1. Physician assistants associate advisory committee
A. The Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners Physician Assistants
Associates Advisory Committee is hereby created within the Louisiana Department
of Health.
B.
* * *
(2) Three members of the committee shall be licensed physician assistants
associates. The physician assistant associate members of the advisory committee
shall be appointed by the governor from a list of names submitted by the Louisiana
Academy of Physician Assistants. At least one of the members of the advisory
committee shall be a physician assistant associate practicing in a parish or
municipality with a population of less than twenty thousand people.
(3) Each physician assistant associate member of the advisory committee
shall:
* * *
(b) Hold a current Louisiana license to practice as a physician assistant
associate.
* * *
(d) Be actively engaged in practice as a physician assistant associate at the
time of appointment.
* * *
C. The duties and purpose of the advisory committee shall be to advise the
Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners on all matters specifically dealing with
licensing or disciplining of physician assistants associate or the drafting and
promulgating of regulations related to physician assistants associates. The advisory
committee shall also review and make recommendations to the board on applications
Page 2 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
for licensure as physician assistants associates. The board shall not act on any matter
relating to a physician assistant associate without first consulting with the advisory
committee.
* * *
§1360.21. Legislative intent
A. Shortages of all skilled health personnel, particularly in rural and urban
medically underserved areas and in the field of primary care medicine, new scientific
and technological developments, and new methods of organizing health services
have made the question of new uses for allied health personnel the critical issue to
be resolved if our supply of health manpower is to be used effectively and
productively. In its concern with the growing shortage and geographic
maldistribution of healthcare services in Louisiana, the rising cost of health care
healthcare services in the state and nationally, and the need for primary health care
healthcare by thousands of Louisiana citizens, the legislature intends to modernize
the laws governing physician assistant associate practice.
B. Physician assistants associates are health care healthcare professionals
qualified by academic and clinical education and licensed by the Louisiana State
Board of Medical Examiners to provide health care healthcare services at the
direction and under the supervision of a physician or a group of physicians approved
by the board as a supervising physician.
C. It is the intent of this Part to permit the more effective utilization of the
skills of physicians, particularly in the primary care setting, by enabling them to
delegate medical services to qualified physician assistants associates when such
delegation is consistent with the patient's health and welfare.
D. It is the intent of this Part to encourage and permit the utilization of
physician assistants associates by physicians and assist in the development of the
physician assistant associate profession and allow for innovative developments of
programs for the education of physician assistants associates. It is also the purpose
of this Part to provide for a system of licensing physician assistants and regulating
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
their relationship with supervising physicians so that a high quality of service is
assured.
§1360.22. Definitions
As used in this Part:
(1) "Approved program" means a program for the education and training of
physician assistants associates which has been formally approved by the Committee
on Allied Health Education and Accreditation, its predecessors, or its successors.
* * *
(5) "Physician assistant associate" means a health professional qualified by
academic and clinical education and licensed by the Louisiana State Board of
Medical Examiners to provide health care healthcare services at the direction and
under the supervision of a physician or a group of physicians approved by the board
as a supervising physician.
(6) "Physician assistant associate-certified (PA-C)" means a physician
assistant who is currently certified by the National Commission on the Certification
of Physicians' Assistants or its successors.
(7) "Supervising physician" means a physician who has been approved by
the board to supervise a physician assistant associate.
(8) "Supervision" means responsible direction and control, with the
supervising physician assuming legal liability for the services rendered by the
physician assistant associate in the course and scope of the physician assistant's
associate's employment. Such supervision shall not be construed in every case to
require the physical presence of the supervising physician. However, the supervising
physician and physician assistant associate must have the capability to be in contact
with each other by either telephone or other telecommunications device. Supervision
shall exist when the supervising physician responsible for the patient gives informed
concurrence of the action of a physician assistant associate, whether given prior to
or after the action, and when a medical treatment plan or action is made in
accordance with written clinical practice guidelines or protocols set forth by the
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
supervising physician. The level and method of supervision shall be at the physician
and physician assistant associate level, shall be documented and reviewed annually,
and shall reflect the acuity of the patient care and nature of the procedure.
(9) "Trainee" means a person who is currently enrolled in an approved
physician assistant associate program.
§1360.23. Powers and duties of the board
A. The board shall have and exercise all powers and duties previously
granted to it, subject to the provisions of Title 36 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950. The powers and authority granted to the board by this Part shall be subject
to the provisions of Title 36 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, and
particularly R.S. 36:259(A) and 803. Except as otherwise provided by this Part, the
board shall also have the power, in consultation with the Physician Assistants
Associates Advisory Committee, to make rules and regulations pertaining to the
approval and regulation of physician assistants and the approval and regulation of
physicians applying to become supervising physicians.
B. The board shall have the authority to may approve or reject an application
for licensure as a physician assistant associate. Licensure shall be valid for no more
than one year but may be renewed annually.
* * *
D. The board shall make and enforce orders, rules, and regulations for the
revocation or suspension of approval of licensure to act as a physician assistant
associate, and for the revocation and suspension of approval of supervising
physicians.
* * *
G. A physician, approved by the board as a supervising physician, practicing
in a private practice, group practice, partnership, professional medical corporation,
or employed by a hospital or other health care healthcare organization or entity may
be the primary supervising physician for up to eight physician assistants associates.
Physician assistants associates may be employed by a group practice or partnership
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
of physicians or a professional medical corporation duly qualified under R.S. 12:901
et seq., as amended, or a hospital or other health care healthcare organization or
entity, as long as such physician assistants associates are being supervised by a
qualified supervising physician.
* * *
I. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Part to the contrary, any
person who before and on June 16, 1993, is currently practicing as a physician
assistant associate under supervision of a licensed physician shall be licensed as a
physician assistant associate.
§1360.24. Licensure
A. Except as otherwise provided for in this Part, an individual shall be
licensed by the board before he may practice as a physician assistant associate. The
board may grant a license to a physician assistant associate applicant who:
* * *
(3) Has successfully completed an education program for physician
assistants associates accredited by the Committee on Allied Health Education and
Accreditation, its predecessors, or its successors and who has passed the physician
assistant associate national certifying examination administered by the National
Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants.
(4) Certifies that he is mentally and physically able to engage in practice as
a physician assistant associate.
(5) Has no licensure, certification, or registration as a physician assistant in
any jurisdiction under current discipline, revocation, suspension, or probation for
cause resulting from the applicant's practice as a physician assistant associate, unless
the board considers such condition and agrees to licensure.
* * *
B. A personal interview of a physician assistant associate applicant shall be
required only in those cases where the applicant is making his first application before
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
the board and where discrepancies exist in the application or the applicant has been
subject to prior adverse licensure, certification, or registration action.
C. The board may grant a working permit, which is valid for one year but
may be renewed by one additional year, to a physician assistant associate applicant
who meets the qualifications for licensure except that the applicant has not yet taken
the national certifying examination or the applicant has taken the national certifying
examination and is awaiting the results.
* * *
.§1360.26. Inactive license
Any physician assistant associate who notifies the board in writing on forms
prescribed by the board may elect to place his licensure on an inactive status. A
physician assistant associate with an inactive status license shall be excused from
payment of renewal fees and shall not practice as a physician assistant associate.
Any licensee who engages in practice while his license is lapsed or on inactive status
shall be considered to be practicing without a license, which shall be grounds for
discipline pursuant to R.S. 37:1360.34. A physician assistant associate requesting
restoration to active status from inactive status shall be required to pay the current
renewal fees and shall be required to meet the criteria for renewal as provided for in
R.S. 37:1360.27.
§1360.27. Renewal
A. Each person who holds a license as a physician assistant associate in this
state shall, upon notification from the board, renew said the license by:
* * *
B. A physician assistant associate seeking licensure renewal will not be
required to make a personal appearance before the board, unless the assistant
associate is currently engaged in a licensure revocation or discipline proceeding.
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
§1360.28. Supervision of physician assistants associates
A. Supervision of a physician assistant associate shall be continuous but
shall not be construed as necessarily requiring the physical presence of the
supervising physician at the time and place that the services are rendered.
B. It is the obligation and responsibility of each supervising physician and
physician assistant associate to ensure:
(1) That the physician assistant's associate's scope of practice is identified.
(2) That delegation of medical tasks and authority is appropriate to the
physician assistant's associate's level of competence.
(3) That the relationship of, and access to, the supervising physician is
defined.
(4) That a process for evaluation of the physician assistant's associate's
performance is established.
§1360.29. Supervising physician qualifications and registration
A. A physician supervising a physician assistant associate shall:
(1) Be licensed and in good standing in this state.
(2) Notify the board of his intent to supervise a physician assistant associate.
(3) Submit a statement to the board that he will exercise supervision over the
physician assistant associate in accordance with any rules and regulations adopted
by the board and that he will retain professional and legal responsibility for the care
rendered by the physician assistant associate.
(4) Maintain a written agreement with the physician assistant associate in
compliance with R.S. 37:1360.22(8) that includes a statement that the physician shall
exercise supervision over the physician assistant associate in accordance with this
Part. The agreement shall be signed by the supervising physician and physician
assistant associate, updated annually, kept on file at the practice site, and available
to the board upon request.
B. Physicians seeking to supervise a physician assistant associate shall be
required to appear before the board upon their first application and notification to the
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
board of their intention to supervise a physician assistant associate when the board
finds discrepancies in the physician's application or when the physician is currently
or has been previously subject to adverse licensure, certification, or registration
actions.
§1360.30. Notification of intent to practice
A. A physician assistant associate licensed in this state, prior to initiating
practice, shall submit, on forms approved by the board, notification of such intent to
practice. Such notification shall include:
(1) The name, business address, and telephone number of the supervising
physician.
(2) The name, business address, and telephone number of the physician
assistant associate.
B. A physician assistant associate shall notify the board of any changes in
or additions to his supervising physicians within thirty days of the date of such
change or addition.
§1360.31. Services performed by physician assistants associates
A.(1) A physician assistant associate performs medical services when such
services are rendered under the supervision of a supervising physician. A physician
assistant associate may perform those duties and responsibilities that are delegated
to him by his supervising physician. A physician assistant associate is considered
to be and is deemed the agent of his supervising physician in the performance of all
practice-related activities, including but not limited to assisting in surgery and the
ordering and interpretation of diagnostic and other medical services. The level and
method of supervision shall be at the physician and physician assistant associate
level, shall be documented and reviewed annually, and shall reflect the acuity of the
patient care and the nature of a procedure. A physician assistant associate shall not
practice without supervision except in life-threatening emergencies and in
emergency situations such as man-made and natural disaster relief efforts.
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
(2) A physician assistant associate may inject local anesthetic agents
subcutaneously, including digital blocks or apply topical anesthetic agents when
delegated to do so by a supervising physician. However, nothing in this Part shall
otherwise permit a physician assistant associate to administer local anesthetics
perineurally, pericurally, epidurally, intrathecally, or intravenously unless such
physician assistant is a certified registered nurse anesthetist and meets the
requirements in R.S. 37:930.
B. The practice of a physician assistant associate shall include includes the
performance of medical services within the scope of his education, training, and
experience, which are delegated by the supervising physician.
C.(1) A physician assistant associate may prescribe, order, and administer
drugs to the extent delegated by the supervising physician except as provided
pursuant to R.S. 37:930 relative to anesthetics. Drugs which may be prescribed,
ordered, and administered by a physician assistant associate or a health care
healthcare professional licensed pursuant to Chapter 12 of this Title are those listed
in Schedules II, III, IV, and V of R.S. 40:964 and legend drugs, which are defined
as any drug or drug product bearing on the label of the manufacturer or distributor,
as required by the Food and Drug Administration, the statement "Caution: Federal
law prohibits dispensing without a prescription". A physician assistant associate
authorized to prescribe controlled substances shall register with the United States
Drug Enforcement Administration.
(2)(a) A physician assistant associate shall meet all of the following
qualifications to be eligible to apply for prescriptive authority:
(i) Have completed a minimum of five hundred clinical training hours prior
to graduation from an approved physician assistant associate educational program.
* * *
(b) The board shall not impose any qualifications for a physician assistant's
associate prescriptive authority, in addition to those set forth in this Paragraph,
through administrative rulemaking.
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
(3) A physician assistant associate may request, receive, and sign for sample
drugs and may distribute sample drugs to a patient.
(4) A physician assistant associate may provide medication-assisted
treatment (MAT), as authorized by the United States Department of Health and
Human Services, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration and
in accordance with rules promulgated by the board. At a minimum, rules
promulgated by the board shall include a requirement that in order for the physician
assistant associate to provide MAT, his supervising physician shall also be
authorized and in compliance with all federal and state laws and rules authorizing the
provision of MAT. For purposes of this Paragraph, "MAT" means the use of
medications with counseling and behavioral therapies to treat substance use disorders
and prevent opioid overdose.
* * *
§1360.32. Assumption of professional liability
When a physician assistant associate is supervised by a physician or group
practice of physicians or a professional medical corporation or a hospital or other
health care healthcare organization or entity, the physician assistant associate shall
be supervised by and be the legal responsibility of the supervising physician or group
practice or professional medical corporation or other hospital or other health care
healthcare organization or entity and the supervising physician. The legal
responsibility for the physician assistant's associate's patient care activities,
including care and treatment that is provided in health care healthcare facilities, shall
remain that of the supervising physician, group practice of physicians, or a
professional medical corporation or a hospital or other health care healthcare
organization or entity.
§1360.33. Violations
The board may, exercising due process, discipline any physician assistant
associate, as provided in R.S. 37:1360.34, who:
* * *
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
(5) Is a habitual user of intoxicants or drugs to such an extent that he is
unable to safely perform as a physician assistant associate.
(6) Has been adjudicated as mentally incompetent or has a mental condition
that renders him unable to safely perform as a physician assistant associate.
* * *
§1360.34. Disciplinary authority
The board, upon finding that a physician assistant associate has committed
any offense described in R.S. 37:1360.33, may:
* * *
(4) Require a physician assistant associate to submit to the care, counseling,
or treatment of a physician or physicians designated by the board.
(5) Place the physician assistant associate on probation with the right to
vacate the probationary order for noncompliance.
* * *
§1360.35. Title and practice protection
A. Any person not licensed under in accordance with this Part is guilty of a
misdemeanor and is subject to penalties applicable to the unlicensed practice of
medicine if he:
(1) Holds himself out as a physician assistant associate.
(2) Uses any combination or abbreviation of the term "physician assistant
associate" to indicate that he is a physician assistant associate.
(3) Acts as a physician assistant associate without being licensed by the
board.
B. An unlicensed physician shall not be permitted to use the title of
"physician assistant associate" or to practice as a physician assistant associate unless
he fulfills the requirements of this Part.
C. Only a physician assistant associate licensed under pursuant to this Part
who has met the current certification requirements of the National Commission on
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1520 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1143
the Certification of Physicians' Assistants and its successors shall be entitled to use
the designation "PA-C" before or after his name or as any title, thereof.
§1360.36. Identification requirements
A physician assistant associate licensed under pursuant to this Part shall keep
his license available for inspection at his primary place of employment and shall,
when engaged in his professional activities, wear a name tag identifying himself as
a "physician assistant associate".
* * *
§1360.38. Exemptions
A. The provisions of this Part shall do not apply to:
* * *
(2) A physician assistant associate administering medical services in cases
of emergency.
(3) A physician assistant associate student enrolled in a physician assistant
associate educational program accredited by the Accreditation Review Commission
on Education for the Physician Assistant.
(4) A physician assistant associate employed by the federal government
while performing duties incidental to that employment.
* * *
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and requested to
change all references in the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 from physician assistant to
physician associate.